New York, session 2025-2026, S9883.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and 2 declares that the enactment of these appropriations provides sufficient 3 authority to the comptroller for the purpose of making payments for the 4 purposes described herein until such time as appropriation bills submit- 5 ted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the state constitution 6 for the support of government for the state fiscal year beginning April 7 1, 2026 are enacted. 8 § 2. Section 2 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 9 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 10 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 § 2. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 12 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 13 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 14 public officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be 15 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 16 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 17 For the purpose of making payments for 18 personal service, including liabilities 19 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the 20 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 21 period April 1 through April [14] 16, 2026 EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12028-01-6 S. 9883 2 1 to state officers and employees of the 2 executive branch, including the governor, 3 lieutenant governor, comptroller, and 4 attorney general, and to employees of the 5 legislature. This appropriation also 6 includes payments for services performed 7 by mentally ill or developmentally disa- 8 bled persons who are employed in state-op- 9 erated special employment, work-for-pay or 10 sheltered workshop programs . [545,352,000] 835,756,000 11 -------------- 12 § 3. Section 3 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 13 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 14 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 § 3. The amount specified in this section, or so much thereof as shall 16 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, is hereby appropri- 17 ated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the public 18 officers and for the purpose specified, which amount shall be available 19 for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 20 ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 21 For the payment of state operations non 22 personal service liabilities to the execu- 23 tive branch, including the comptroller, 24 and the attorney general, and legislature, 25 incurred in the ordinary course of busi- 26 ness, during the period April 1 through 27 April [14] 16, 2026, pursuant to existing 28 state law and for purposes for which the 29 legislature authorized the expenditure of 30 moneys during the 2025-2026 state fiscal 31 year; provided, however, that nothing 32 contained herein shall be deemed to limit 33 or restrict the power or authority of 34 state departments or agencies to conduct 35 their activities or operations in accord- 36 ance with existing law, and further 37 provided that nothing contained herein 38 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify or 39 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 40 state finance law prescribing when appro- 41 priations made for the 2025-2026 state 42 fiscal year shall have ceased to have 43 force and effect ......................... 44 .............................. [22,000,000] 32,000,000 45 -------------- 46 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 47 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 48 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 49 respective public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount 50 shall be available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. S. 9883 3 1 MISCELLANEOUS - - ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 2 The sum of ten million dollars 3 ($10,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 4 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 5 designated, is hereby appropriated for 6 contracts and grants approved for purposes 7 for which the legislature authorized the 8 expenditures of money during the 2025-2026 9 fiscal year. An amount up to ten million 10 dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available 11 for the payment of capital projects 12 liabilities incurred during the period 13 from April 1 through April 16, 2026 for 14 contracts and grants approved prior to 15 April 1, 2026, provided, however, that 16 nothing contained herein shall be deemed 17 to limit or restrict the power or authori- 18 ty of state departments or agencies to 19 conduct their activities or operations in 20 accordance with existing law, and further 21 provided that nothing contained herein 22 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify, or 23 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 24 state finance law prescribing when appro- 25 priations made for the 2025-2026 fiscal 26 year shall have ceased to have force and 27 effect ...................................... 10,000,000 28 -------------- 29 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 30 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 31 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 32 respective public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount 33 shall be available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 34 MISCELLANEOUS - - ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 35 The sum of twenty million dollars 36 ($20,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 37 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 38 designated, is hereby appropriated for 39 contracts and grants approved for purposes 40 for which the legislature authorized the 41 expenditures of money during the 2025-2026 42 fiscal year. An amount up to twenty 43 million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be 44 available for the payment of capital 45 projects liabilities incurred during the 46 period from April 1 through April 16, 2026 47 for contracts and grants approved after 48 April 1, 2026, provided, however, that 49 nothing contained herein shall be deemed 50 to limit or restrict the power or authori- 51 ty of state departments or agencies to 52 conduct their activities or operations in S. 9883 4 1 accordance with existing law, and further 2 provided that nothing contained herein 3 shall be deemed to supersede, nullify, or 4 modify the provisions of section 40 of the 5 state finance law prescribing when appro- 6 priations made for the 2025-2026 fiscal 7 year shall have ceased to have force and 8 effect ..................................... 20,000,000 9 -------------- 10 § 6. Section 4 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 11 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 12 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 § 4. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 14 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 15 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 16 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 17 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 18 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES 19 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 20 STATE OPERATIONS 21 GENERAL STATE CHARGES ........................ [57,685,000] 620,043,500 22 -------------- 23 General Fund 24 State Purposes Account - 10050 25 For employee fringe benefits according to 26 the following project schedule including 27 those benefits which are related to 28 employees paid from funds, accounts, or 29 programs where the division of the budget 30 has issued waivers (85022) ... [57,685,000] 620,043,500 31 Project Schedule 32 PROJECT AMOUNT 33 -------------------------------------------- 34 For the state's contribution 35 to the health insurance fund 36 and deposit into the retiree 37 health benefit trust fund 38 pursuant to section 99-aa of 39 the state finance law. The 40 state's share of the health 41 insurance program dividends 42 shall be available to pay 43 for the premiums in 2026-27 .. 514,422,000 44 For the state's contribution 45 to the social security 46 contribution fund ............. 55,000,000 47 For the state's contribution S. 9883 5 1 to employee benefit fund 2 programs ...................... 40,500,000 3 For the state's contribution 4 to the dental insurance plan ... 7,415,000 5 For the payment of the metro- 6 politan commuter transporta- 7 tion mobility tax pursuant 8 to article 23 of the tax 9 law, as added by chapter 25 10 of the laws of 2009, on 11 behalf of the state employ- 12 ees employed in the metro- 13 politan commuter transporta- 14 tion district .................. 2,335,000 15 For the state's share of 16 contributions to the volun- 17 tary defined contribution 18 plan made on behalf of 19 eligible employees pursuant 20 to chapter 18 of the laws 21 of 2012 who elect to partic- 22 ipate in such plan and who 23 are not otherwise eligi- 24 ble to participate in the 25 SUNY optional retirement 26 program .......... [350,000] 354,500 27 For the state's contribution 28 to the vision care plan ........... 17,000 29 -------------- 30 Project schedule total ... 31 ............ [57,685,000] 620,043,500 32 -------------- 33 § 7. Section 5 of chapter 100 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 34 appropriations for the support of government, is amended to read as 35 follows: 36 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 37 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 38 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 39 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 40 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 41 JUDICIARY 42 For the purpose of making payments for 43 personal service, including liabilities 44 incurred prior to April 1, 2026, on the 45 payrolls scheduled to be paid during the 46 period April 1 through April [14] 16, 2026 47 to officers and employees of the judiciary .. 85,000,000 48 For the payment of state operations nonper- 49 sonal service liabilities, the sum of 50 thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000), or 51 so much thereof as shall be sufficient to 52 accomplish the purpose designated, is 53 hereby appropriated to the judiciary out S. 9883 6 1 of any moneys in the general fund or other 2 funds to the credit of the state purposes 3 account not otherwise appropriated. The 4 comptroller is hereby authorized and 5 directed to utilize this appropriation for 6 the purpose of making payments for nonper- 7 sonal service liabilities incurred by the 8 judiciary from April 1 through April [14] 9 16, 2026 .................................... 13,000,000 10 For the payment of aid to localities liabil- 11 ities, the sum of eleven million dollars 12 ($11,000,000), or so much thereof as shall 13 be sufficient to accomplish the purpose 14 designated, is hereby appropriated to the 15 judiciary out of any moneys in the general 16 fund or other funds to the credit of the 17 state purposes account not otherwise 18 appropriated. The comptroller is hereby 19 authorized and directed to utilize this 20 appropriation for the purpose of making 21 payments for aid to localities liabilities 22 incurred by the judiciary from April 1 23 through April [14] 16, 2026 ................. 11,000,000 24 For the payment of employee fringe benefit 25 programs including, but not limited to, 26 the judiciary's contributions to the 27 health insurance fund, the employees' 28 retirement system pension accumulation 29 fund, the social security contribution 30 fund, employee benefit fund programs, the 31 dental insurance plan, the vision care 32 plan, the unemployment insurance fund, and 33 for workers' compensation benefits, the 34 sum of sixty-two million two hundred fifty 35 thousand dollars ($62,250,000), or so much 36 thereof as shall be sufficient to accom- 37 plish the purpose designated, is hereby 38 appropriated to the judiciary out of any 39 moneys in the general fund or other funds 40 to the credit of the state purposes 41 account not otherwise appropriated. The 42 comptroller is hereby authorized and 43 directed to utilize this appropriation for 44 the purpose of making payments for employ- 45 ee fringe benefit liabilities incurred by 46 the judiciary from April 1 through April 47 [14] 16, 2026 ............................... 62,250,000 48 -------------- 49 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 50 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 51 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 52 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 53 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. S. 9883 7 1 OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERIVCES 2 AID TO LOCALITIES 3 ADOPTION SUBSIDY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ......................... 20,340,000 4 -------------- 5 General Fund 6 Local Assistance Account - 10000 7 For services and expenses for the adoption 8 subsidy program pursuant to title 9 of 9 article 6 of the social services law. 10 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 11 of law, the liability of the state to 12 social services districts and the amount 13 to be distributed or otherwise expended by 14 the state to reimburse social services 15 districts pursuant to section 456 of the 16 social services law shall be 62 percent of 17 eligible social services district expendi- 18 tures. 19 The amount hereby appropriated is to be 20 available for payment of aid heretofore 21 accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 22 palities. Subject to the approval of the 23 director of the budget, such funds shall 24 be available to the office net of disal- 25 lowances, refunds, reimbursements, and 26 credits. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 28 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 29 be transferred to any other appropriation 30 within the office of children and family 31 services and/or the office of temporary 32 and disability assistance and/or suballo- 33 cated to the office of temporary and disa- 34 bility assistance for the purpose of 35 paying local social services districts' 36 costs of the above program and may be 37 increased or decreased by interchange with 38 any other appropriation or with any other 39 item or items within the amounts appropri- 40 ated within the office of children and 41 family services general fund - local 42 assistance account with the approval of 43 the director of the budget who shall file 44 such approval with the department of audit 45 and control and copies thereof with the 46 chairman of the senate finance committee 47 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 48 means committee. 49 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 50 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 51 the social services law, or payments of 52 federal funds otherwise due to the local S. 9883 8 1 social services districts for programs 2 provided under the federal social security 3 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 4 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 5 by the state commissioner or the state 6 commissioner of health as due from local 7 social services districts each month as 8 their share of payments made pursuant to 9 section 367-b of the social services law 10 may be set aside by the state comptroller 11 in an interest-bearing account with such 12 interest accruing to the credit of the 13 locality in order to ensure the orderly 14 and prompt payment of providers under 15 section 367-b of the social services law 16 pursuant to an estimate provided by the 17 commissioner of health of each local 18 social services district's share of 19 payments made pursuant to section 367-b of 20 the social services law. 21 The amounts appropriated herein shall be 22 available for reimbursement of local 23 district claims only to the extent that 24 such claims are submitted within twenty- 25 four months of the last day of the state 26 fiscal year in which the expenditures were 27 incurred, unless waived for good cause by 28 the commissioner subject to the approval 29 of the director of the budget. 30 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 31 of law including, but not limited to, any 32 chapter of the laws of 2026 which enacts a 33 targeted inflationary increase for the 34 state fiscal year beginning on April 1, 35 2026, the commissioner shall continue to 36 apply any targeted inflationary increase 37 in effect on March 31, 2026 for the entire 38 rate year that began when such cost of 39 living adjustment increase was in effect. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, amounts due and owing to 42 a social services district under this 43 appropriation, may be reduced up to such 44 amounts due and owing to the state under 45 section 529 of the executive law (13917) .... 20,340,000 46 -------------- 47 § 9. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 48 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 49 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 50 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 51 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 52 OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE 53 AID TO LOCALITIES S. 9883 9 1 EMPLOYMENT AND INCOME SUPPORT PROGRAM ...................... 262,533,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 Local Assistance Account - 10000 5 For state reimbursement of the safety net 6 assistance program as established pursuant 7 to chapter 436 of the laws of 1997. 8 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 9 services law or any other inconsistent 10 provision of law, funds appropriated here- 11 in shall reimburse 29 percent of safety 12 net assistance expenditures, including the 13 cost of providing shelter supplements for 14 safety net assistance households at local 15 option, including eligible households 16 containing a household member who has been 17 released from prison, in order to prevent 18 eviction and address homelessness in 19 accordance with social services district 20 plans approved by the office of temporary 21 and disability assistance and the director 22 of the budget, provided, however, that in 23 social services districts with a popu- 24 lation over five million no shelter 25 supplements other than the family home- 26 lessness and eviction prevention supple- 27 ment shall be reimbursed, provided however 28 funds appropriated herein shall only be 29 used to reimburse rental costs up to the 30 maximum rent levels in place as of January 31 1, 2021, then adjusted consistent with the 32 annual year-over-year percentage changes 33 in fair market rent, provided, however, in 34 the event of a decrease in fair market 35 rent the value of the maximum rent levels 36 reimbursed with funds appropriated herein 37 shall not decrease and shall be set at the 38 maximum rent levels established during the 39 prior year, and further provided that such 40 supplements shall not be part of the stan- 41 dard of need pursuant to section 131-a of 42 the social services law. Funds appropri- 43 ated herein shall also reimburse 29 44 percent of safety net assistance expendi- 45 tures, in social services districts with a 46 population over five million, for emergen- 47 cy shelter, transportation, or nutrition 48 payments which the district determines are 49 necessary to establish or maintain inde- 50 pendent living arrangements among persons 51 living with medically diagnosed HIV 52 infection as defined by the AIDS institute 53 of the state department of health and who 54 are homeless or facing homelessness and S. 9883 10 1 for whom no viable and less costly alter- 2 native to housing is available; provided, 3 however, that funds appropriated herein 4 may only be used for such purposes if the 5 cost of such allowances are not eligible 6 for reimbursement under medical assistance 7 or other programs. 8 Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29 9 percent of safety net assistance expendi- 10 tures, in social services districts with a 11 population of five million or fewer, for 12 emergency shelter payments promulgated by 13 the office of temporary and disability 14 assistance which the district determines 15 are necessary to establish or maintain 16 independent living arrangements among 17 persons living with medically diagnosed 18 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 19 institute of the state department of 20 health and who are homeless or facing 21 homelessness and for whom no viable and 22 less costly alternative to housing is 23 available; provided, however, that funds 24 appropriated herein may only be used for 25 such purposes if the cost of such allow- 26 ances are not eligible for reimbursement 27 under medical assistance or other 28 programs. 29 Funds appropriated herein shall reimburse 29 30 percent of safety net assistance expendi- 31 tures, in social services districts with a 32 population of five million or fewer, for 33 emergency shelter payments in excess of 34 those promulgated by the office of tempo- 35 rary and disability assistance but not 36 exceeding an amount reasonably approximate 37 to 100 percent of fair market rent, at 38 local option which the district determines 39 are necessary to establish or maintain 40 independent living arrangements among 41 persons living with medically diagnosed 42 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 43 institute of the state department of 44 health and who are homeless or facing 45 homelessness and for whom no viable and 46 less costly alternative to housing is 47 available; provided, however, that funds 48 appropriated herein may only be used for 49 such purposes if the cost of such allow- 50 ances are not eligible for reimbursement 51 under medical assistance or other 52 programs. Such emergency shelter payments 53 shall only be made at local option and in 54 accordance with a plan approved by the 55 office of temporary and disability assist- 56 ance and the director of the budget. S. 9883 11 1 Provided, however, notwithstanding section 2 153 of the social services law or any 3 other inconsistent provision of law, if 4 necessary funding, as determined by the 5 director of the budget, is secured in a 6 social services district from the medical 7 assistance program by reducing the capita- 8 tion rates paid to medicaid managed care 9 organizations by the amount of savings 10 resulting from stably housing individuals 11 living with medically diagnosed HIV 12 infection as defined by the AIDS institute 13 of the state department of health, the 14 social services district shall make such 15 emergency shelter payments in excess of 16 those promulgated by the office of tempo- 17 rary and disability assistance but not 18 exceeding an amount reasonably approximate 19 to 100 percent of fair market rent, and 20 the savings shall be used to reimburse 100 21 percent of the cost of such excess emer- 22 gency shelter payments for cases reim- 23 bursed under the safety net assistance or 24 family assistance programs in social 25 services districts with a population of 26 five million or fewer, in accordance with 27 a plan approved by the office of temporary 28 and disability assistance and the director 29 of the budget; provided further that 30 reimbursement shall be provided to medi- 31 caid managed care organizations through 32 adjustments to capitation rates should 33 actual gross savings not be realized as 34 determined by the director of the budget. 35 For persons living with medically diagnosed 36 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 37 institute of the state department of 38 health living in social services districts 39 with a population over five million who 40 are receiving public assistance, funds 41 appropriated herein shall be used to reim- 42 burse 29 percent of the additional rental 43 costs determined based on limiting such 44 person's earned and/or unearned income 45 contribution to 30 percent. 46 For persons living with medically diagnosed 47 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 48 institute of the state department of 49 health living in social services districts 50 with a population of five million or fewer 51 who are receiving public assistance, funds 52 appropriated herein may be used to reim- 53 burse up to 100 percent of the additional 54 rental costs determined based on limiting 55 such person's earned and/or unearned 56 income contribution to 30 percent. Such S. 9883 12 1 payments of additional rental costs shall 2 only be made at local option and in 3 accordance with a plan approved by the 4 office of temporary and disability assist- 5 ance and the director of the budget. 6 Provided, however, notwithstanding section 7 153 of the social services law or any 8 other inconsistent provision of law, if 9 necessary funding, as determined by the 10 director of the budget, is secured in a 11 social services district from the medical 12 assistance program by reducing the capita- 13 tion rates paid to medicaid managed care 14 organizations by the amount of savings 15 resulting from stably housing individuals 16 living with medically diagnosed HIV 17 infection as defined by the AIDS institute 18 of the state department of health, the 19 social services district shall make such 20 payments of additional rental costs, for 21 cases reimbursed under the safety net 22 assistance and family assistance program, 23 and the savings shall be used to reimburse 24 100 percent of the cost of the additional 25 rental costs determined based on limiting 26 such person's earned and/or unearned 27 income contribution to 30 percent in 28 social services districts with a popu- 29 lation of five million or fewer, in 30 accordance with a plan approved by the 31 office of temporary and disability assist- 32 ance and the director of the budget; 33 provided further that reimbursement shall 34 be provided to medicaid managed care 35 organizations through adjustments to capi- 36 tation rates should actual gross savings 37 not be realized as determined by the 38 director of the budget. 39 Amounts appropriated herein may be used to 40 enter into contracts with persons or enti- 41 ties authorized pursuant to subdivision 42 (j) of section 17 of the social services 43 law consistent with federal law and 44 requirements. Such contracts will be 45 consistent with subdivision (j) of section 46 17 of the social services law. Notwith- 47 standing section 153 of the social 48 services law or any other inconsistent 49 provision of law, the office may reduce 50 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 51 services districts to recover 29 percent 52 of costs incurred by the office for 53 expenditures related to subdivision (j) of 54 section 17 of the social services law. 55 Such funds are to be available for payment 56 of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to S. 9883 13 1 accrue to municipalities. Subject to the 2 approval of the director of the budget, 3 such funds shall be available to the 4 office of temporary and disability assist- 5 ance net of disallowances, refunds, 6 reimbursements, and credits, including 7 those related to title IV-E of the social 8 security act; and including, but not 9 limited to, additional federal funds 10 resulting from any changes in federal cost 11 allocation methodologies. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 14 be increased or decreased by interchange 15 with any other appropriation within the 16 office of temporary and disability assist- 17 ance general fund - local assistance 18 account with the approval of the director 19 of the budget, who shall file such 20 approval with the department of audit and 21 control and copies thereof with the chair- 22 man of the senate finance committee and 23 the chairman of the assembly ways and 24 means committee. 25 Social services districts shall be required 26 to report to the office of temporary and 27 disability assistance on an annual basis, 28 information, as determined and requested 29 by the office, related to services and 30 expenditures for which reimbursement is 31 sought for providing temporary housing 32 assistance to homeless individuals and 33 families. Such information shall be 34 submitted electronically to the extent 35 feasible as determined by the office, and 36 shall be used to evaluate expenditures by 37 such social services districts for the 38 provision of temporary housing assistance 39 for homeless individuals and families. 40 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 41 services law, or any other inconsistent 42 provision of law, the office of temporary 43 and disability assistance may withhold or 44 deny reimbursement, in whole or in part, 45 to any social services district that fails 46 to develop or submit a homeless services 47 plan subject to the approval of the office 48 of temporary and disability assistance, 49 fails to provide homeless services and 50 outreach in accordance with its approved 51 homeless services plan, or fails to devel- 52 op or submit homeless services outcome 53 reports, consistent with those require- 54 ments promulgated by the office of tempo- 55 rary and disability assistance. S. 9883 14 1 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 2 services law, or any other inconsistent 3 provision of law, such appropriation shall 4 be available for reimbursement of eligible 5 costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026 6 and before January 1, 2027, that are 7 otherwise reimbursable by the state on or 8 after April 1, 2026, that are claimed by 9 March 1, 2027. Such reimbursement shall 10 constitute total state reimbursement for 11 activities funded herein in state fiscal 12 year 2026-2027 (52203) ...................... 79,200,000 13 For expenditures for additional state 14 payments for eligible aged, blind, and 15 disabled persons related to supplemental 16 security income and for expenditures made 17 pursuant to title 8 of article 5 of the 18 social services law. Such funds are avail- 19 able for payment of aid heretofore accrued 20 or hereafter to accrue. Notwithstanding 21 any inconsistent provision of law, the 22 amount herein appropriated may be 23 increased or decreased by interchange with 24 any other appropriation within the office 25 of temporary and disability assistance 26 general fund - local assistance account 27 with the approval of the director of the 28 budget, who shall file such approval with 29 the department of audit and control and 30 copies thereof with the chairman of the 31 senate finance committee and the chairman 32 of the assembly ways and means committee 33 (52311) ..................................... 58,333,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 37 Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Account - 25178 38 For reimbursement of the cost of the family 39 assistance and the emergency assistance to 40 families programs. Notwithstanding section 41 153 of the social services law or any 42 inconsistent provision of law, funds 43 appropriated herein shall be provided 44 without state or local participation 45 except that for social services districts 46 with a population of five million or more, 47 reimbursement will be eighty-five percent. 48 Funds appropriated herein shall also 49 include the cost of providing shelter 50 supplements for family assistance house- 51 holds at local option, including eligible 52 households containing a household member 53 who has been released from prison, in 54 order to prevent eviction and address S. 9883 15 1 homelessness in accordance with social 2 services district plans approved by the 3 office of temporary and disability assist- 4 ance and the director of the budget, 5 provided, however, that in social services 6 districts with a population over five 7 million no shelter supplements other than 8 the family homelessness and eviction 9 prevention supplement shall be reimbursed, 10 provided however funds appropriated herein 11 shall only be used to reimburse rental 12 costs up to the maximum rent levels in 13 place as of January 1, 2021, then adjusted 14 consistent with the annual year-over-year 15 percentage changes in fair market rent, 16 provided, however, in the event of a 17 decrease in fair market rent the value of 18 the maximum rent levels reimbursed with 19 funds appropriated herein shall not 20 decrease and shall be set at the maximum 21 rent levels established during the prior 22 year, and further provided that such 23 supplements shall not be part of the stan- 24 dard of need pursuant to section 131-a of 25 the social services law. 26 Funds appropriated herein shall also reim- 27 burse for family assistance expenditures 28 for emergency shelter, transportation, or 29 nutrition payments which the district 30 determines are necessary to establish or 31 maintain independent living arrangements 32 among persons living with medically diag- 33 nosed HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 34 institute of the state department of 35 health and who are homeless or facing 36 homelessness and for whom no viable and 37 less costly alternative to housing is 38 available; provided, however, that funds 39 appropriated herein may only be used for 40 such purposes if the cost of such allow- 41 ances are not eligible for reimbursement 42 under medical assistance or other 43 programs. 44 For persons living with medically diagnosed 45 HIV infection as defined by the AIDS 46 institute of the state department of 47 health who are receiving public assistance 48 funds appropriated herein shall not be 49 used to reimburse the additional rental 50 costs determined based on limiting such 51 person's earned and/or unearned income 52 contribution to 30 percent. 53 Amounts appropriated herein may be used to 54 enter into contracts with persons or enti- 55 ties authorized pursuant to subdivision 56 (j) of section 17 of the social services S. 9883 16 1 law consistent with federal law and 2 requirements. Such contracts will be made 3 consistent with subdivision (j) of section 4 17 of the social services law. Notwith- 5 standing section 153 of the social 6 services law or any other inconsistent 7 provision of law, the office may reduce 8 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 9 services districts to recover the federal 10 share of costs incurred by the office for 11 expenditures related to subdivision (j) of 12 section 17 of the social services law. 13 Such funds are to be available for payment 14 of aid heretofore accrued or hereafter to 15 accrue to municipalities. Subject to the 16 approval of the director of the budget, 17 such funds shall be available to the 18 office of temporary and disability assist- 19 ance net of disallowances, refunds, 20 reimbursements, and credits including, but 21 not limited to, additional federal funds 22 resulting from any changes in federal cost 23 allocation methodologies. 24 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 25 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 26 be increased or decreased by interchange 27 with any other appropriation within the 28 office of temporary and disability assist- 29 ance federal fund - local assistance 30 account with the approval of the director 31 of the budget, who shall file such 32 approval with the department of audit and 33 control and copies thereof with the chair- 34 man of the senate finance committee and 35 the chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. 37 Social services districts shall be required 38 to report to the office of temporary and 39 disability assistance on an annual basis, 40 information, as determined and requested 41 by the office, related to services and 42 expenditures for which reimbursement is 43 sought for providing temporary housing 44 assistance to homeless individuals and 45 families. Such information shall be 46 submitted electronically to the extent 47 feasible as determined by the office, and 48 shall be used to evaluate expenditures by 49 such social services districts for the 50 provision of temporary housing assistance 51 for homeless individuals and families. 52 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 53 services law, or any other inconsistent 54 provision of law, the office of temporary 55 and disability assistance may withhold or 56 deny reimbursement, in whole or in part, S. 9883 17 1 to any social services district that fails 2 to develop or submit a homeless services 3 plan subject to the approval of the office 4 of temporary and disability assistance, 5 fails to provide homeless services and 6 outreach in accordance with its approved 7 homeless services plan, or fails to devel- 8 op or submit homeless services outcome 9 reports, consistent with those require- 10 ments promulgated by the office of tempo- 11 rary and disability assistance. 12 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 13 services law, or any other inconsistent 14 provision of law, such appropriation shall 15 be available for reimbursement of eligible 16 costs incurred on or after January 1, 2026 17 and before January 1, 2027, that are 18 otherwise reimbursable by the state on or 19 after April 1, 2026, that are claimed by 20 March 1, 2027. Such reimbursement shall 21 constitute total federal reimbursement for 22 activities funded herein in state fiscal 23 year 2026-27 (52203) ....................... 125,000,000 24 -------------- 25 § 10. Section 5 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 26 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 27 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 § 5. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 29 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 30 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 31 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 32 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 33 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 34 AID TO LOCALITIES 35 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM .......... [20,910,000] 23,050,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 Local Assistance Account - 10000 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 Indian health program pursuant to a plan 41 prepared by the commissioner of health and 42 approved by the director of the budget. 43 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 44 for payment of financial assistance here- 45 tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue 46 (26840) ...................................... 7,000,000 47 -------------- 48 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 49 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund S. 9883 18 1 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 2 For various federal food and nutritional 3 services. The moneys hereby appropriated 4 shall be available for payment of finan- 5 cial assistance heretofore accrued (26986) 6 .............................. [13,910,000] 16,050,000 7 ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM ............ 1,200,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 HCRA Resources Fund 11 EPIC Premium Account - 20818 12 For services and expenses of the program for 13 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage, 14 including reimbursement to pharmacies 15 participating in such program. The moneys 16 hereby appropriated shall be available for 17 payment of financial assistance heretofore 18 accrued (26803) .............................. 1,200,000 19 -------------- 20 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ............... [2,569,881,000] 4,529,831,000 21 -------------- 22 General Fund 23 Local Assistance Account - 10000 24 For the medical assistance program, includ- 25 ing administrative expenses, for local 26 social services districts, and for medical 27 care rates for authorized child care agen- 28 cies. 29 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 30 finance law or any provision of law to the 31 contrary, subject to federal approval, 32 department of health state funds medicaid 33 spending, excluding payments for medical 34 services provided at state facilities 35 operated by the office of mental health, 36 the office for people with developmental 37 disabilities and the office of addiction 38 services and supports and further exclud- 39 ing any payments which are not appropri- 40 ated within the department of health, in 41 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 42 2026 through March 31, 2027, shall not 43 exceed $36,099,200,000 except as provided 44 below provided, however, such aggregate 45 limits may be adjusted by the director of 46 the budget to account for any changes in 47 the New York state federal medical assist- 48 ance percentage amount established pursu- 49 ant to the federal social security act, S. 9883 19 1 increases in provider revenues, reductions 2 in local social services district payments 3 for medical assistance administration, 4 minimum wage increases, and beginning 5 April 1, 2012 the operational costs of the 6 New York state medical indemnity fund, 7 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 8 2011, and state costs or savings from the 9 essential plan program. Such projections 10 may be adjusted by the director of the 11 budget to account for increased or expe- 12 dited department of health state funds 13 medicaid expenditures as a result of a 14 natural or other type of disaster, includ- 15 ing a governmental declaration of emergen- 16 cy. 17 The director of the budget, in consultation 18 with the commissioner of health, shall 19 assess on a quarterly basis known and 20 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 21 ry of service and by geographic region, as 22 defined by the commissioner, incurred both 23 prior to and subsequent to such assessment 24 for each such period, and if the director 25 of the budget determines that such expend- 26 itures are expected to cause medicaid 27 spending for such period to exceed the 28 aggregate limit specified herein for such 29 period, the state medicaid director, in 30 consultation with the director of the 31 budget and the commissioner of health, 32 shall develop a medicaid savings allo- 33 cation adjustment to limit such spending 34 to the aggregate limit specified herein 35 for such period. 36 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 37 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 38 tures authorized by the appropriations 39 herein in compliance with the following 40 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 41 in compliance with applicable federal law, 42 including the provisions of the Patient 43 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 44 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 45 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 46 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 47 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent 48 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 49 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 50 made in a manner that complies with the 51 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- 52 al centers for medicare and medicaid 53 services, provided, however, that the 54 commissioner of health is authorized to 55 submit any state plan amendment or seek 56 other federal approval, including waiver S. 9883 20 1 authority, to implement the provisions of 2 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 3 that meets the other criteria set forth 4 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 5 manner that maximizes federal financial 6 participation, to the extent practicable, 7 including any federal financial partic- 8 ipation that is available or is reasonably 9 expected to become available, in the 10 discretion of the commissioner, under the 11 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 12 be made uniformly among categories of 13 services and geographic regions of the 14 state, to the extent practicable, and 15 shall be made uniformly within a category 16 of service, to the extent practicable, 17 except where the commissioner determines 18 that there are sufficient grounds for 19 non-uniformity, including but not limited 20 to: the extent to which specific catego- 21 ries of services contributed to department 22 of health medicaid state funds spending in 23 excess of the limits specified herein; the 24 need to maintain safety net services in 25 underserved communities; or the potential 26 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 27 models contemplated by the Affordable Care 28 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 29 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 30 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 31 shall be made in a manner that does not 32 unnecessarily create administrative 33 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 34 ents or providers. 35 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 36 legislature, as well as organizations 37 representing health care providers, 38 consumers, businesses, workers, health 39 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 40 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 41 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 42 all or part of such adjustment, in the 43 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 44 to have a material impact on the overall 45 medicaid program, particular categories of 46 service or particular geographic regions 47 of the state. 48 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 49 savings allocation adjustment on the 50 department of health's website and shall 51 provide written copies of such adjustment 52 to the chairs of the senate finance and 53 the assembly ways and means committees at 54 least 30 days before the date on which 55 implementation is expected to begin. S. 9883 21 1 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 2 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 3 to the provisions of notice and prior to 4 implementation but needs to provide a new 5 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 6 this paragraph only if the commissioner 7 determines, in his or her discretion, that 8 such revisions materially alter the 9 adjustment. 10 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 11 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 12 commissioner need not seek the input 13 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 14 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 15 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 16 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 17 development and implementation of a medi- 18 caid savings allocation adjustment is 19 necessary due to a public health emergen- 20 cy. 21 For purposes of this section, a public 22 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 23 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 24 significantly increases the immediate need 25 for health care personnel in an area of 26 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 27 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 28 serious communicable disease, or the 29 potential for such widespread risk of 30 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 31 condition determined by the commissioner 32 to constitute an imminent threat to public 33 health. 34 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 35 prevent all or part of such medicaid 36 savings allocation adjustment from taking 37 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 38 ted by the federal centers for medicare 39 and medicaid services. 40 In accordance with the medicaid savings 41 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 42 the department of health shall reduce 43 department of health state funds medicaid 44 spending by the amount of the projected 45 overspending through, actions including, 46 but not limited to modifying or suspending 47 reimbursement methods, including but not 48 limited to all fees, premium levels and 49 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 50 provision of law that sets a specific 51 amount or methodology for any such 52 payments or rates of payment; modifying or 53 discontinuing medicaid program benefits; 54 seeking all necessary federal approvals, 55 including, but not limited to waivers, 56 waiver amendments; and suspending time S. 9883 22 1 frames for notice, approval or certif- 2 ication of rate requirements, notwith- 3 standing any provision of law, rule or 4 regulation to the contrary, including but 5 not limited to sections 2807 and 3614 of 6 the public health law, section 18 of chap- 7 ter 2 of the laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 8 505.14(h). 9 The department of health shall prepare a 10 quarterly report that sets forth: (a) 11 known and projected department of health 12 medicaid expenditures as described in 13 subdivision (1) of this section, and 14 factors that could result in medicaid 15 disbursements for the relevant state 16 fiscal year to exceed the projected 17 department of health state funds disburse- 18 ments in the enacted budget financial plan 19 pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 23 of 20 the state finance law, including spending 21 increases or decreases due to: enrollment 22 fluctuations, rate changes, utilization 23 changes, MRT investments, and shift of 24 beneficiaries to managed care; and vari- 25 ations in offline medicaid payments; and 26 (b) the actions taken to implement any 27 medicaid savings allocation adjustment 28 implemented pursuant to subdivision (4) of 29 this section, including information 30 concerning the impact of such actions on 31 each category of service and each 32 geographic region of the state. Each such 33 quarterly report shall be provided to the 34 chairs of the senate finance and the 35 assembly ways and means committees and 36 shall be posted on the department of 37 health's website in a timely manner. 38 The money hereby appropriated is to be 39 available for payment of aid heretofore 40 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 41 palities, and to providers of medical 42 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 43 social services law, and for payment of 44 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 45 ers of family care where payment systems 46 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 47 operational. 48 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 49 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 50 by the department for outside legal 51 assistance on issues involving the federal 52 government, the conduct of preadmission 53 screening and annual resident reviews 54 required by the state's medicaid program, 55 computer matching with insurance carriers 56 to insure that medicaid is the payer of S. 9883 23 1 last resort and activities related to the 2 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 3 able under the medicaid program. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 5 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 6 the social services law, or payments of 7 federal funds otherwise due to the local 8 social services districts for programs 9 provided under the federal social security 10 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 11 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 12 by the state commissioner of temporary and 13 disability assistance or the state commis- 14 sioner of health as due from local social 15 services districts each month as their 16 share of payments made pursuant to section 17 367-b of the social services law may be 18 set aside by the state comptroller in an 19 interest-bearing account in order to 20 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 21 providers under section 367-b of the 22 social services law pursuant to an esti- 23 mate provided by the commissioner of 24 health of each local social services 25 district's share of payments made pursuant 26 to section 367-b of the social services 27 law. 28 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 29 of law, funding made available by these 30 appropriations shall support direct salary 31 costs and related fringe benefits within 32 the medical assistance program associated 33 with any minimum wage increase that takes 34 effect during the timeframe of these 35 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 36 the labor law. Each eligible organization 37 in receipt of funding made available by 38 these appropriations may be required to 39 submit written certification, in such form 40 and at such time the commissioner may 41 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 42 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 43 tion, how such funding will be or was used 44 for purposes eligible under these appro- 45 priations and any other reporting deemed 46 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 47 appropriated herein may include advances 48 to organizations authorized to receive 49 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 50 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 51 the money hereby appropriated may be 52 increased or decreased by interchange or 53 transfer, with any appropriation of the 54 department of health and the office of 55 medicaid inspector general and may be 56 increased or decreased by transfer or S. 9883 24 1 suballocation between these appropriated 2 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 3 ment of health state purpose account, the 4 office of mental health, office for people 5 with developmental disabilities, the 6 office of addiction services and supports, 7 the department of family assistance office 8 of temporary and disability assistance, 9 the department of corrections and communi- 10 ty supervision, the office of information 11 technology services, the state university 12 of New York, and office of children and 13 family services, the office of medicaid 14 inspector general, the state education 15 department, and the state office for the 16 aging with the approval of the director of 17 the budget, who shall file such approval 18 with the department of audit and control 19 and copies thereof with the chairman of 20 the senate finance committee and the 21 chairman of the assembly ways and means 22 committee. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 24 of law to the contrary, the moneys hereby 25 appropriated may be used for payments to 26 the centers for medicaid and medicare 27 services for obligations incurred related 28 to the pharmaceutical costs of dually 29 eligible medicare/medicaid beneficiaries 30 participating in the medicare drug benefit 31 authorized by P.L. 108-173. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated 34 shall not be used for any existing rates, 35 fees, fee schedule, or procedures which 36 may affect the cost of care and services 37 provided by personal care providers, case 38 managers, health maintenance organiza- 39 tions, out of state medical facilities 40 which provide care and services to resi- 41 dents of the state, providers of transpor- 42 tation services, that are altered, 43 amended, adjusted or otherwise changed by 44 a local social services district unless 45 previously approved by the department of 46 health and the director of the budget. 47 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 48 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 49 made available to the commissioner of the 50 office of mental health or the commission- 51 er of the office of addiction services and 52 supports, in consultation with the commis- 53 sioner of health and approved by the 54 director of the budget, and consistent 55 with appropriations made therefor, to 56 implement allocation adjustment developed S. 9883 25 1 by each such commissioner which shall 2 describe mental health or substance use 3 disorder services that should be developed 4 to meet service needs resulting from the 5 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 6 services provided under the medicaid 7 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 8 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 9 law. Such programs may include programs 10 that are licensed pursuant to both article 11 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 12 28 of the public health law, or certified 13 under both article 32 of the mental 14 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 15 health law. 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 17 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 18 be available for payments associated with 19 the resolution by settlement agreement or 20 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 21 where the department of health is a party. 22 For services and expenses of the medical 23 assistance program including hospital 24 inpatient services and general hospitals 25 that are safety-net providers that evince 26 severe financial distress, pursuant to 27 criteria determined by the commissioner, 28 shall be eligible for awards for amounts 29 appropriated herein, to enable such 30 providers to maintain operations and vital 31 services while establishing long term 32 solutions to achieve sustainable health 33 services. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 35 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 36 the medical assistance program for any 37 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 38 without the approval of the director of 39 the budget. 40 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 41 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 42 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 43 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 44 reappropriation for this item covering 45 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 46 ation for this item covering fiscal year 47 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 48 laws of 2025 (26947) ......... [48,476,000] 72,714,000 49 For services and expenses of the medical 50 assistance program including hospital 51 outpatient and emergency room services. 52 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 53 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 54 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 55 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 56 reappropriation for this item covering S. 9883 26 1 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 2 ation for this item covering fiscal year 3 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 4 laws of 2025 (26948) ......... [14,498,000] 21,747,000 5 For services and expenses of the medical 6 assistance program including clinic 7 services. 8 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 9 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 10 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 11 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 12 reappropriation for this item covering 13 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 14 ation for this item covering fiscal year 15 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 16 laws of 2025 (26949) ......... [28,396,000] 42,594,000 17 For services and expenses of the medical 18 assistance program including nursing home 19 services. 20 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 21 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 22 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 23 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 24 reappropriation for this item covering 25 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 26 ation for this item covering fiscal year 27 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 28 laws of 2025 (26950) ........ [71,370,000] 107,055,000 29 For services and expenses of the medical 30 assistance program including other long 31 term care services. 32 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 33 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 34 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 35 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 36 reappropriation for this item covering 37 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 38 ation for this item covering fiscal year 39 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 40 laws of 2025 (26951) ........ [339,972,000] 509,958,000 41 For services and expenses of the medical 42 assistance program including managed care 43 services including regional planning 44 activities of the finger lakes health 45 systems agency, including statewide coor- 46 dination and demonstration of best prac- 47 tices. The department shall make grants 48 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 49 assure high-quality and accessible primary 50 care, to provide technical assistance to 51 support financial and business planning 52 for integrated systems of care, and to 53 assist primary care providers in the 54 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 55 use of electronic health record technolo- 56 gy. S. 9883 27 1 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 2 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 3 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 4 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 5 reappropriation for this item covering 6 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 7 ation for this item covering fiscal year 8 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 9 laws of 2025 (26952) ........ [311,420,000] 467,130,000 10 For services and expenses for health homes 11 including grants to health homes. 12 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 13 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 14 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 15 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 16 reappropriation for this item covering 17 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 18 ation for this item covering fiscal year 19 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 20 laws of 2025 (29548) ......... [7,540,000] 11,310,000 21 For services and expenses of the medical 22 assistance program including pharmacy 23 services provided, however, that no funds 24 shall be made available pursuant to this 25 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 26 authorized in any enacted law, rule, or 27 regulation without approval from the 28 director of the budget. 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 30 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 31 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 32 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 33 reappropriation for this item covering 34 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 35 ation for this item covering fiscal year 36 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 37 laws of 2025 (26953) ........ [143,852,000] 215,778,000 38 For services and expenses of the medical 39 assistance program including transporta- 40 tion services. 41 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 42 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 43 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 44 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 45 reappropriation for this item covering 46 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 47 ation for this item covering fiscal year 48 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 49 laws of 2025 (26954) ......... [20,664,000] 30,996,000 50 For services and expenses of the medical 51 assistance program including dental 52 services. 53 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 54 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 55 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 56 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) S. 9883 28 1 reappropriation for this item covering 2 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 3 ation for this item covering fiscal year 4 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 5 laws of 2025 (26955) ............ [158,000] 237,000 6 For services and expenses of the medical 7 assistance program including non-institu- 8 tional and other spending. 9 The money hereby appropriated is available 10 for payment of liabilities heretofore 11 accrued or hereafter accrued. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 14 be available for payments to any county or 15 public school districts associated with 16 additional claims for school supportive 17 health services. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 20 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 21 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 22 reappropriation for this item covering 23 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 24 ation for this item covering fiscal year 25 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 26 laws of 2025 (26956) ......... [41,208,000] 61,812,000 27 For services and expenses of the medical 28 assistance program including medical 29 services provided at state facilities 30 operated by the office of mental health, 31 the office for people with developmental 32 disabilities and the office of addiction 33 services and supports. 34 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 35 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 36 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 37 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 38 reappropriation for this item covering 39 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 40 ation for this item covering fiscal year 41 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 42 laws of 2025 (26961) ........ [192,308,000] 288,462,000 43 -------------- 44 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 45 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 46 Medicaid Direct Account - 25106 47 For services and expenses for the medical 48 assistance program, including administra- 49 tive expenses for local social services 50 districts, pursuant to title XIX of the 51 federal social security act or its succes- 52 sor program. 53 The moneys hereby appropriated are to be 54 available for payment of aid heretofore S. 9883 29 1 accrued or hereafter accrued to munici- 2 palities, and to providers of medical 3 services pursuant to section 367-b of the 4 social services law, and for payment of 5 state aid to municipalities and to provid- 6 ers of family care where payment systems 7 through the fiscal intermediaries are not 8 operational. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 10 of law, funding made available by these 11 appropriations shall support direct salary 12 costs and related fringe benefits within 13 the medical assistance program associated 14 with any minimum wage increase that takes 15 effect during the timeframe of these 16 appropriations, pursuant to section 652 of 17 the labor law. Each eligible organization 18 in receipt of funding made available by 19 these appropriations may be required to 20 submit written certification, in such form 21 and at such time the commissioner may 22 prescribe, attesting to the total amount 23 of funds used by the eligible organiza- 24 tion, how such funding will be or was used 25 for purposes eligible under these appro- 26 priations and any other reporting deemed 27 necessary by the commissioner. The amounts 28 appropriated herein may include advances 29 to organizations authorized to receive 30 such funds to accomplish this purpose. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 32 the money hereby appropriated may be 33 increased or decreased by interchange or 34 transfer, with any appropriation of the 35 department of health and the office of 36 medicaid inspector general and may be 37 increased or decreased by transfer or 38 suballocation between these appropriated 39 amounts and appropriations of the office 40 of mental health, office for people with 41 developmental disabilities, the office of 42 addiction services and supports, the 43 department of family assistance office of 44 temporary and disability assistance, 45 office of children and family services, 46 the department of financial services, 47 department of corrections and community 48 supervision, the office of information 49 technology services, the state university 50 of New York, the state education depart- 51 ment, and the state office for the aging 52 with the approval of the director of the 53 budget, who shall file such approval with 54 the department of audit and control and 55 copies thereof with the chairman of the S. 9883 30 1 senate finance committee and the chairman 2 of the assembly ways and means committee. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, in lieu of payments authorized by 5 the social services law, or payments of 6 federal funds otherwise due to the local 7 social services districts for programs 8 provided under the federal social security 9 act or the federal food stamp act, funds 10 herein appropriated, in amounts certified 11 by the state commissioner of temporary and 12 disability assistance or the state commis- 13 sioner of health as due from local social 14 services districts each month as their 15 share of payments made pursuant to section 16 367-b of the social services law may be 17 set aside by the state comptroller in an 18 interest-bearing account in order to 19 ensure the orderly and prompt payment of 20 providers under section 367-b of the 21 social services law pursuant to an esti- 22 mate provided by the commissioner of 23 health of each local social services 24 district's share of payments made pursuant 25 to section 367-b of the social services 26 law. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 28 of law to the contrary, funds shall be 29 made available to the commissioner of the 30 office of mental health or the commission- 31 er of the office of addiction services and 32 supports, in consultation with the commis- 33 sioner of health and approved by the 34 director of the budget, and consistent 35 with appropriations made therefor, to 36 implement allocation adjustment developed 37 by each such commissioner which shall 38 describe mental health or substance use 39 disorder services that should be developed 40 to meet service needs resulting from the 41 reduction of inpatient behavioral health 42 services provided under the medicaid 43 program, by programs licensed pursuant to 44 article 31 or 32 of the mental hygiene 45 law. Such programs may include programs 46 that are licensed pursuant to both article 47 31 of the mental hygiene law and article 48 28 of the public health law, or certified 49 under both article 32 of the mental 50 hygiene law and article 28 of the public 51 health law. 52 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 53 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 54 be available for payments associated with 55 the resolution by settlement agreement or S. 9883 31 1 judgment of rate appeals and/or litigation 2 where the department of health is a party. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions 4 of law, no expenditures shall be used for 5 the medical assistance program for any 6 expenses not explicitly authorized in law 7 without the approval of the director of 8 the budget. 9 For services and expenses of the medical 10 assistance program including hospital 11 inpatient services. 12 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 13 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 14 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 15 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 16 reappropriation for this item covering 17 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 18 ation for this item covering fiscal year 19 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 20 laws of 2025 (26947) ........ [75,885,000] 151,770,000 21 For services and expenses of the medical 22 assistance program including hospital 23 outpatient and emergency room services. 24 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 25 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 26 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 27 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 28 reappropriation for this item covering 29 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 30 ation for this item covering fiscal year 31 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 32 laws of 2025 (26948) ........ [13,524,000] 27,048,000 33 For services and expenses of the medical 34 assistance program including clinic 35 services. 36 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 37 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 38 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 39 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 40 reappropriation for this item covering 41 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 42 ation for this item covering fiscal year 43 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 44 laws of 2025 (26949) ........ [21,897,000] 43,794,000 45 For services and expenses of the medical 46 assistance program including nursing home 47 services. 48 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 49 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 50 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 51 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 52 reappropriation for this item covering 53 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 54 ation for this item covering fiscal year 55 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 56 laws of 2025 (26950) ....... [112,740,000] 225,480,000 S. 9883 32 1 For services and expenses of the medical 2 assistance program including other long 3 term care services. 4 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 5 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 6 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 7 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 8 reappropriation for this item covering 9 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 10 ation for this item covering fiscal year 11 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 12 laws of 2025 (26951) ....... [321,609,000] 643,218,000 13 For services and expenses of the medical 14 assistance program including managed care 15 services including regional planning 16 activities of the finger lakes health 17 systems agency, including statewide coor- 18 dination and demonstration of best prac- 19 tices. The department shall make grants 20 within amounts appropriated therefor, to 21 assure high-quality and accessible primary 22 care, to provide technical assistance to 23 support financial and business planning 24 for integrated systems of care, and to 25 assist primary care providers in the 26 adoption, implementation, and meaningful 27 use of electronic health record technolo- 28 gy. 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 30 of law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 31 ry, funds appropriated herein shall not be 32 subject to article 6 of the financial 33 services law. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 36 ry, funds appropriated herein shall only 37 be made available for applied behavior 38 analysis services if such services are 39 recommended by a health care or mental 40 health care practitioner authorized under 41 title eight of the education law who has 42 been designated as an applied behavior 43 analysis center of excellence provider by 44 the commissioner of health. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 46 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 47 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 48 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 49 reappropriation for this item covering 50 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 51 ation for this item covering fiscal year 52 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 53 laws of 2025 (26952) ....... [392,468,000] 784,936,000 54 For services and expenses of the medical 55 assistance program including pharmacy 56 services, provided, however, that no funds S. 9883 33 1 shall be made available pursuant to this 2 appropriation for any drug not explicitly 3 authorized in any heretofore enacted law, 4 rule, or regulation without approval from 5 the director of the budget. 6 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 7 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 8 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 9 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 10 reappropriation for this item covering 11 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 12 ation for this item covering fiscal year 13 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 14 laws of 2025 (26953) ....... [118,219,000] 236,438,000 15 For services and expenses of the medical 16 assistance program including transporta- 17 tion services. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 19 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 20 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 21 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 22 reappropriation for this item covering 23 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 24 ation for this item covering fiscal year 25 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 26 laws of 2025 (26954) ........ [15,882,000] 31,764,000 27 For services and expenses of the medical 28 assistance program including dental 29 services. 30 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 31 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 32 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 33 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 34 reappropriation for this item covering 35 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 36 ation for this item covering fiscal year 37 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 38 laws of 2025 (26955) .......... [1,836,000] 3,672,000 39 For services and expenses of the medical 40 assistance program including noninstitu- 41 tional and other spending. 42 The money hereby appropriated is available 43 for payment of liabilities heretofore 44 accrued or hereafter accrued. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 46 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 47 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 48 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 49 reappropriation for this item covering 50 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 51 ation for this item covering fiscal year 52 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 53 laws of 2025 (26956) ....... [179,805,000] 359,610,000 54 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 55 of law, subject to the approval of the 56 director of the budget, upon submission of S. 9883 34 1 an allocation adjustment from the commis- 2 sioner of health, the amount appropriated 3 herein, together with any available feder- 4 al matching funds, may be transferred or 5 suballocated to the office of mental 6 health, office of addiction services and 7 supports, office for people with develop- 8 mental disabilities, division of housing 9 and community renewal, New York state 10 housing trust fund corporation, and office 11 of temporary and disability assistance for 12 services and expenses related to providing 13 affordable housing. Any such spending 14 shall consider the geographical location 15 of the grants. 16 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 17 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 18 ation covering fiscal year 2026-27 shall 19 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 20 reappropriation for this item covering 21 fiscal year 2026-27, and (ii) appropri- 22 ation for this item covering fiscal year 23 2026-27 set forth in chapter 53 of the 24 laws of 2025 (29521) ........ [96,154,000] 192,308,000 25 -------------- 26 § 11. Section 6 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 27 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 28 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 § 6. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 30 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 31 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 32 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 33 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 34 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR 35 AID TO LOCALITIES 36 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ...... [360,000,000] 540,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Enterprise Funds 39 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund 40 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Account - 50650 41 For payment of unemployment insurance bene- 42 fits pursuant to article 18 of the labor 43 law or as authorized by the federal 44 government through the disaster unemploy- 45 ment assistance program, the emergency 46 unemployment compensation program, the 47 extended benefit program, the federal 48 additional compensation program or any 49 other federally funded unemployment bene- 50 fit program (34787) ......... [360,000,000] 540,000,000 S. 9883 35 1 -------------- 2 § 12. Section 7 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 3 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 4 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 7. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 6 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 7 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 8 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 9 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 10 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE 11 OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES 12 AID TO LOCALITIES 13 COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM .................. [161,883,000] 305,253,000 14 -------------- 15 General Fund 16 Local Assistance Account - 10000 17 For services and expenses of the community 18 services program, net of disallowances, 19 for community programs for people with 20 developmental disabilities pursuant to 21 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 22 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 23 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 24 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 25 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 26 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and 27 other provisions of the mental hygiene 28 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 29 provision of law, the following appropri- 30 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 31 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 32 credits. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 34 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 35 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 36 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 37 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 38 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 39 and approved by the director of the budg- 40 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 41 available to reimburse or advance locali- 42 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for 43 expenditures made during local fiscal 44 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 45 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 46 for the 3 month period beginning January 47 1, 2027. 48 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 49 of the mental hygiene law or any other S. 9883 36 1 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 2 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 3 such contract and in the manner provided 4 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 5 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 6 cies arising out of loans which are funded 7 from the proceeds of bonds and notes 8 issued by the dormitory authority of the 9 state of New York. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 11 the money hereby appropriated may be 12 transferred to state operations and/or any 13 appropriation of the office for people 14 with developmental disabilities with the 15 approval of the director of the budget. 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 17 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 18 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 19 of the net deficit costs of day training 20 programs and family support services. 21 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 22 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 23 other inconsistent provision of law, with 24 relation to the operation of certified 25 family care homes, including family care 26 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 27 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 28 ation may be used for payments to purchase 29 general services including but not limited 30 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 31 14 days, at rates to be established by the 32 commissioner and approved by the director 33 of the budget in consideration of factors 34 including, but not limited to, geographic 35 area and number of clients cared for in 36 the home and for payment in an amount 37 determined by the commissioner for the 38 personal needs of each client residing in 39 the family care home. 40 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 41 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 42 law and any other inconsistent provision 43 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 44 be used for expenses of family care homes 45 including payments to operators of certi- 46 fied family care homes for damages caused 47 by clients to personal and real property 48 in accordance with standards established 49 by the commissioner and approved by the 50 director of the budget. 51 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 52 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 53 be used for appropriate day program 54 services and residential services includ- 55 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 56 subsidies to individuals, start-up S. 9883 37 1 expenses for family care providers, envi- 2 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 3 ogies, appraisals, property options, 4 feasibility studies and preoperational 5 expenses. 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 7 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the 8 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 9 targeted inflationary increase, for the 10 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 11 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 12 shall not apply any other inflationary 13 increases, cost of living type increases, 14 inflation factors, or trend factors for 15 the purpose of establishing rates of 16 payments, contracts or any other form of 17 reimbursement; provided that this shall 18 not prevent the commissioner from applying 19 prior adjustments for the purpose of 20 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 21 ing of base year costs. 22 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 23 tion law and any other provision of law, 24 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 25 support staff in programs certified or 26 approved by the office for people with 27 developmental disabilities, including the 28 home and community based services waiver 29 programs that the office for people with 30 developmental disabilities is authorized 31 to administer with federal approval pursu- 32 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 33 the federal social security act, are 34 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 35 may specify when performed under the 36 supervision, training and periodic 37 inspection of a registered professional 38 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 39 practitioner's ordered care. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, and consistent with 42 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 43 the directors of facilities licensed but 44 not operated by the office for people with 45 developmental disabilities who act as 46 federally-appointed representative payees 47 and who assume management responsibility 48 over the funds of a resident may continue 49 to use such funds for the cost of the 50 resident's care and treatment, consistent 51 with federal law and regulations. 52 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 53 in accordance with the following: 54 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 55 of law, the director of the budget is 56 authorized to make suballocations from S. 9883 38 1 this appropriation to the department of 2 health medical assistance program. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, and pursuant to criteria estab- 5 lished by the commissioner of the office 6 for people with developmental disabilities 7 and approved by the director of the budg- 8 et, expenditures may be made from this 9 appropriation for residential facilities 10 which are pending recertification as 11 intermediate care facilities for people 12 with developmental disabilities. 13 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14 41.36 of the mental hygiene law and any 15 other inconsistent provision of law, 16 moneys from this appropriation may be used 17 for payment up to $250 per year per 18 client, at such times and in such manner 19 as determined by the commissioner on the 20 basis of financial need for the personal 21 needs of each client residing in voluntar- 22 y-operated community residences and volun- 23 tary-operated community residential alter- 24 natives, including individualized 25 residential alternatives under the home 26 and community based services waiver. The 27 commissioner shall, subject to the 28 approval of the director of the budget, 29 alter existing advance payment schedules 30 for voluntary-operated community resi- 31 dences established pursuant to section 32 41.36 of the mental hygiene law. 33 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 34 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 35 be used for the operation of clinics 36 licensed pursuant to article 16 of the 37 mental hygiene law including, but not 38 limited to, supportive and habilitative 39 services consistent with the home and 40 community based services waiver. 41 For the state and/or local share of medical 42 assistance services expenses incurred by 43 the department of health for the provision 44 of medical assistance services to people 45 with developmental disabilities (37835) .. 46 ............................ [140,004,000] 280,008,000 47 For services and expenses of the community 48 services program, net of disallowances, 49 for community programs for people with 50 developmental disabilities pursuant to 51 article 41 of the mental hygiene law, 52 and/or chapter 620 of the laws of 1974, 53 chapter 660 of the laws of 1977, chapter 54 412 of the laws of 1981, chapter 27 of the 55 laws of 1987, chapter 729 of the laws of 56 1989, chapter 329 of the laws of 1993 and S. 9883 39 1 other provisions of the mental hygiene 2 law. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 3 provision of law, the following appropri- 4 ation shall be net of prior and/or current 5 year refunds, rebates, reimbursements, and 6 credits. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 8 advances and reimbursement made pursuant 9 to subdivision (d) of section 41.15 and 10 section 41.18 of the mental hygiene law 11 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan and 12 in a manner prescribed by the agency head 13 and approved by the director of the budg- 14 et. The moneys hereby appropriated are 15 available to reimburse or advance locali- 16 ties and voluntary non-profit agencies for 17 expenditures made during local fiscal 18 periods commencing January 1, 2026, April 19 1, 2026 or July 1, 2026, and for advances 20 for the 3 month period beginning January 21 1, 2027. 22 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 41 23 of the mental hygiene law or any other 24 inconsistent provision of law, rule or 25 regulation, the commissioner, pursuant to 26 such contract and in the manner provided 27 therein, may pay all or a portion of the 28 expenses incurred by such voluntary agen- 29 cies arising out of loans which are funded 30 from the proceeds of bonds and notes 31 issued by the dormitory authority of the 32 state of New York. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 34 the money hereby appropriated may be 35 transferred to state operations and/or any 36 appropriation of the office for people 37 with developmental disabilities with the 38 approval of the director of the budget. 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 40 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 41 be used for state aid of up to 100 percent 42 of the net deficit costs of day training 43 programs and family support services. 44 Notwithstanding the provisions of section 45 16.23 of the mental hygiene law and any 46 other inconsistent provision of law, with 47 relation to the operation of certified 48 family care homes, including family care 49 homes sponsored by voluntary not-for-pro- 50 fit agencies, moneys from this appropri- 51 ation may be used for payments to purchase 52 general services including but not limited 53 to respite providers, up to a maximum of 54 14 days, at rates to be established by the 55 commissioner and approved by the director 56 of the budget in consideration of factors S. 9883 40 1 including, but not limited to, geographic 2 area and number of clients cared for in 3 the home and for payment in an amount 4 determined by the commissioner for the 5 personal needs of each client residing in 6 the family care home. 7 Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivi- 8 sion 12 of section 8 of the state finance 9 law and any other inconsistent provision 10 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 11 be used for expenses of family care homes 12 including payments to operators of certi- 13 fied family care homes for damages caused 14 by clients to personal and real property 15 in accordance with standards established 16 by the commissioner and approved by the 17 director of the budget. 18 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 19 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 20 be used for appropriate day program 21 services and residential services includ- 22 ing, but not limited to, direct housing 23 subsidies to individuals, start-up 24 expenses for family care providers, envi- 25 ronmental modifications, adaptive technol- 26 ogies, appraisals, property options, 27 feasibility studies and preoperational 28 expenses. 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 30 of law, moneys from this appropriation may 31 be used to fund continuity of care 32 services, family reimbursed respite, other 33 than personal services and direct housing 34 subsidies for people who are enrolled in 35 OPWDD's self-direction program, provided 36 any or all such costs are identified in a 37 self-direction budget approved by OPWDD. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 39 of law except pursuant to a chapter of the 40 laws of 2025 authorizing a 2.6 percent 41 targeted inflationary increase, for the 42 period commencing on April 1, 2025 and 43 ending March 31, 2026 the commissioner 44 shall not apply any other inflationary 45 increases, cost of living type increases, 46 inflation factors, or trend factors for 47 the purpose of establishing rates of 48 payments, contracts or any other form of 49 reimbursement; provided that this shall 50 not prevent the commissioner from applying 51 prior adjustments for the purpose of 52 establishing rates resulting from a rebas- 53 ing of base year costs. 54 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 55 tion law and any other provision of law, 56 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct S. 9883 41 1 support staff in programs certified or 2 approved by the office for people with 3 developmental disabilities, including the 4 home and community based services waiver 5 programs that the office for people with 6 developmental disabilities is authorized 7 to administer with federal approval pursu- 8 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 9 the federal social security act, are 10 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 11 may specify when performed under the 12 supervision, training and periodic 13 inspection of a registered professional 14 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 15 practitioner's ordered care. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, and consistent with 18 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 19 the directors of facilities licensed but 20 not operated by the office for people with 21 developmental disabilities who act as 22 federally-appointed representative payees 23 and who assume management responsibility 24 over the funds of a resident may continue 25 to use such funds for the cost of the 26 resident's care and treatment, consistent 27 with federal law and regulations. 28 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 29 in accordance with the following: 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, funds appropriated herein 32 are available to reimburse in- and 33 out-of-state private residential schools, 34 pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 35 13.37-a and subdivision (g) of section 36 13.38 of the mental hygiene law, for costs 37 of supporting the residential and day 38 program services available to individuals 39 who are over the age of 21 years of age, 40 provided that the amount paid for residen- 41 tial services and/or maintenance costs is 42 net of any supplemental security income 43 benefit to which the individual receiving 44 services is eligible, and provided further 45 that funding for nonresidential services 46 will be in an amount not to exceed the 47 maximum reimbursement for appropriate day 48 services delivered by the office for 49 people with developmental disabilities 50 certified or approved providers other than 51 in- and out-of-state private residential 52 schools, unless otherwise authorized by 53 the director of the budget. 54 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 55 finance law, section 142 of the economic 56 development law, and article 41 of the S. 9883 42 1 mental hygiene law, the commissioner of 2 the office for people with developmental 3 disabilities may make the funds appropri- 4 ated herein available as state aid, a loan 5 or a grant, pursuant to terms and condi- 6 tions established by the commissioner of 7 the office for people with developmental 8 disabilities, to cover a portion of the 9 development costs of private, public 10 and/or non-profit organizations, including 11 corporations and partnerships established 12 pursuant to the private housing finance 13 law and/or any other statutory provisions, 14 for supportive housing units that have 15 been set aside for individuals with intel- 16 lectual and developmental disabilities. 17 Further, the office for people with devel- 18 opmental disabilities shall have a lien on 19 the real property developed with such 20 state aid, loans or grants, which shall be 21 in the amount of the loan or grant, for a 22 maximum term of 30 years, or other longer 23 term consistent with the requirements of 24 another regulatory agency. 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 provision of residential services to 27 people with developmental disabilities 28 (37802) ...................... [12,701,000] 14,655,000 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 provision of day program services to 31 people with developmental disabilities 32 (37803) ....................... [3,120,000] 3,600,000 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 provision of family support services to 35 people with developmental disabilities 36 (37804) ....................... [3,510,000] 4,050,000 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 provision of workshop, day training and 39 employment services to people with devel- 40 opmental disabilities. Notwithstanding any 41 other provision of law, up to [$29,900] 42 $34,500 of this appropriation may be 43 transferred to the New York State Educa- 44 tion Departments' Adult Career and Contin- 45 uing Education Services - Vocational Reha- 46 bilitation (ACCES-VR) program to support 47 the LongTerm Sheltered Employment program 48 operated by FEDCAP Rehabilitation 49 Services, Inc. (37805) ....... [2,028,000] 2,340,000 50 For other services and expenses provided to 51 people with developmental disabilities 52 including but not limited to hepatitis B, 53 care at home waiver, epilepsy services, 54 Special Olympics New York, Inc. and volun- 55 tary fingerprinting (37806) ..... [520,000] 600,000 56 -------------- S. 9883 43 1 § 13. Section 8 of chapter 98 of the laws of 2026, relating to making 2 appropriations for the support of government, as amended by chapter 100 3 of the laws of 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 8. The amounts specified in this section, or so much thereof as 5 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, is hereby 6 appropriated and authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the 7 public officers and for the purposes specified, which amount shall be 8 available for the state fiscal year beginning April 1, 2026. 9 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES 10 AID TO LOCALITIES 11 BLIND VETERAN ANNUITY ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ....................... 385,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 Local Assistance Account - 10000 15 For payment of annuities to blind veterans 16 and eligible surviving spouses. Up to 17 $15,000 of this appropriation may be 18 transferred to state operations for admin- 19 istrative costs associated with this 20 program (54606) ................................ 385,000 21 -------------- 22 VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM .............. [78,000] 90,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Homeless Veterans Assistance Fund 26 Homeless Veterans Assistance Account - 20204 27 For services and expenses related to home- 28 less veterans' housing (54815) ... [78,000] 90,000 29 -------------- 30 § 14. No expenditure may be made from any appropriation in this act, 31 until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director of the 32 budget and a copy of such certificate shall have been filed with the 33 state comptroller, the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 34 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee provided, however, 35 that any expenditures from any appropriation in this act made by the 36 legislature or judiciary shall not require such certificate. 37 § 15. All expenditures and disbursements made against the appropri- 38 ations in this act shall, upon final action by the legislature on appro- 39 priation bills submitted by the governor pursuant to article VII of the 40 state constitution for the support of government for the state fiscal 41 year beginning April 1, 2026, be transferred by the comptroller as 42 expenditures and disbursements to such appropriations for all state 43 departments and agencies, as applicable, in amounts equal to the amounts 44 charged against the appropriations in this act for each such department, 45 agency, and the legislature and the judiciary. S. 9883 44 1 § 16. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdi- 2 vision, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 3 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 4 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 5 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 6 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 7 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 8 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 9 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 10 § 17. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 11 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026; provided, 12 however, that upon the transfer of expenditures and disbursements by the 13 comptroller as provided in section fifteen of this act, the appropri- 14 ations made by this act and subject to such section shall be deemed 15 repealed.